Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska74-917
Rules and regulations; dispute; notice; hearing.

In the event of any dispute or disagreement between any employee and any employer as to the intent, meaning, and interpretation of any or all of the rules adopted in accordance with section 74-915, the Department of Labor shall give notice, to the parties interested, of a date for hearing thereon. After hearing the testimony of all parties, it shall enter an order in accordance therewith.

Laws 1955, c. 189, § 3, p. 537.